Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6586YH (3) 91 da/js H.F. 2443 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 191.11 Country of origin labeling 1 program. 2 1. The department shall adopt rules to establish a country 3 of origin labeling program for beef and pork meat products 4 sold in this state on a retail basis including muscle cuts of 5 beef, muscle cuts of pork, ground beef, and ground pork. The 6 rules may be based on regulations requiring country of origin 7 labeling for those products as published in 74 Fed. Reg. 2658. 8 2. The department shall not adopt rules described in 9 subsection 1, until it obtains any necessary waiver from 10 the United States department of agriculture based on an 11 authorizing statute enacted by the United States Congress. If 12 the department determines that it requires state legislation 13 prior to adopting any rules under this section, the department 14 shall prepare and submit such legislation to the Ninety-second 15 General Assembly prior to its first session convening. The 16 department shall submit a report to the general assembly 17 no later than January 1, 2027, detailing its progress in 18 implementing this section. 19